Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.26
Motor vehicle dealer, defined.

Motor vehicle dealer
means any person, other than a bona fide consumer, actively and regularly
engaged in the act of selling, leasing for a period of thirty or more days,
or exchanging new or used motor vehicles, trailers, and manufactured homes
who buys, sells, exchanges, causes the sale of, or offers or attempts to sell
new or used motor vehicles. Such person is a motor vehicle dealer and subject
to the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

Motor vehicle
dealer does not include a lessor who was not involved in or associated with
the selection, location, acquisition, or supply of a motor vehicle which is
the subject of a lease agreement.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 38.

The definition of a motor vehicle dealer under this section entails three requirements. To be a motor vehicle dealer, a person must (1) not be a bona fide consumer; (2) be actively and regularly engaged in selling, leasing for a period of 30 or more days, or exchanging new or used motor vehicles; and (3) buy, sell, exchange, cause the sale of, or offer or attempt to sell new or used motor vehicles. State v. Merchant, 288 Neb. 439, 848 N.W.2d 630 (2014).